Washington statutes.
RCW 10.79.020

To whom directed—Contents.

All such warrants shall be directed to the sheriff of the county, or his or her deputy, or to any constable of the county, commanding such officer to search the house or place where the stolen property or other things for which he or she is required to search are believed to be concealed, which place and property, or things to be searched for shall be designated and described in the warrant, and to bring such stolen property or other things, when found, and the person in whose possession the same shall be found, before the magistrate who shall issue the warrant, or before some other magistrate or court having cognizance of the case.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1061; Code 1881 s 969; 1873 p 216 s 155; 1854 p 101 s 3; RRS s 2239.]